Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB491.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3014(b) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 3014. Network modernization plans.* * *(b) Options for amendment of network modernization plan.--Local exchange telecommunications companies shall have the following options:* * *(9) Effective January 1, 2026, the network modernization plans of all local exchange telecommunications companies shall be deemed amended to provide that the local exchange telecommunications company is not required to make broadband 12345678910111213141516171819 available under this chapter to any customer or location to which broadband is available from any other provider utilizing any technology.(10) Effective January 1, 2027, the network modernization plans of all local exchange telecommunications companies shall be deemed amended to provide that the local exchange telecommunications company is not required to make broadband available under this chapter to any customer or location.(11) Effective January 1, 2027, notwithstanding any other provisions of this title or any other law, the network modernization plans of all local exchange telecommunications companies shall be deemed amended to provide as follows:(i) telecommunications services offered by the local exchange telecommunications company may be supplied using any technology, provided that the use of an alternative technology shall not be construed to grant any additional jurisdiction or authority to the commission over the service or technology; and(ii) the local exchange telecommunications company shall not have the duty to extend, expand or continue in place its facilities to furnish telecommunications services when the customer has service available from one or more alternative providers of wireline or wireless communications services.* * *Section 2. Section 3019(c) of Title 66 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3019. Additional powers and duties.* * *20250SB0491PN0446 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) [(Reserved).] Streamlined regulations for telecommunications carriers.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title and subject to paragraph (2), the commission, within 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph , by order published on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website and served upon all certificated telecommunications carriers, shall permanently waive its regulations at 52 Pa. Code Ch. 53 (relating to tariffs for noncommon carriers), §§ 53.57 (relating to definitions), 53.58 (relating to offering of competitive services), 53.59 (relating to cost support requirements and effective filing dates for tariff filings of noncompetitive services), 53.60 (relating to promotional offerings and bundled service packages ) and 53.85 (relating to paper billing fees), as well as all provisions of 52 Pa. Code Chs. 63 (relating to telecommunications service) and 64 (relating to standards and billing practices for residential telecommunications service).(2) The waiver of regulations under paragraph (1) shall not apply to the following provisions of 52 Pa. Code:(i) Section 63.37 (relating to operation of the Telecommunications Relay Service System and Relay Service Fund).(ii) Ch. 63 Subch. L (relating to universal service).(iii) Section 64.23 (relating to standardizing LEC responses to customer contacts alleging unauthorized charges added to the customer's bill (cramming) and unauthorized changes to the customer's long distance carrier (slamming)).20250SB0491PN0446 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The regulations specified in paragraph (2) and any other commission regulations shall remain in effect subject to the commission's authority to alter, amend, waive or rescind the regulations according to applicable law.(4) The commission shall promptly rescind the regulations waived under paragraph (1).(5) With the exception of the regulations specified in paragraph (2), every three years after the effective date of this paragraph, the commission shall undertake a review of all regulations , orders, requirements and policy statements applicable to telecommunications carriers and shall rescind regulations , orders, requirements and policy statements that are no longer necessary or in the public interest. If the commission promulgates any new regulation or requirement applicable to telecommunications carriers, the new regulation or requirement must be supported by factual findings and determinations, based on an evidentiary record, demonstrating need for the regulation given the emergence of new industry participants, technological changes, electronic means for billing and customer notices, costs of compliance, consumer preference, the competitive market for telecommunications services and that the benefits of the regulation outweigh the cost to comply with and enforce the regulation.(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a telecommunications carrier may not be required to obtain, amend or abandon a certificate of public convenience related to Chapters 11 (relating to certificates of public convenience) and 19 (relating to securities and obligations), and a telecommunications carrier may not be required to obtain commission approval of a transaction if the 20250SB0491PN0446 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 telecommunications carrier or an affiliate thereof files a related application with the Federal Communications Commission and if the telecommunications carrier provides written notice to the commission of its filing with the Federal Communications Commission. Commission approval shall be deemed to be had and obtained by operation of law 30 calendar days after the filing of written notice with the commission.(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the commission shall have no jurisdiction over and shall not regulate any voice-over-Internet protocol service or Internet protocol-enabled service, as those terms are defined in section 3 of the act of July 4, 2008 (P.L.627, No.52), known as the Voice-Over-Internet Protocol Freedom Act, or any other broadband or Internet access service, including the facilities used to provide the services.(c.1) Issues, disputes and appointments.-- (1) If a customer of a retail voice service within the commission's jurisdiction contacts the commission with an issue or dispute with the customer's local exchange telecommunications company, including service availability subject to section 3014(b)(11)(ii) (relating to network modernization plans), the commission shall forward relevant information to a local exchange telecommunications company-maintained email address. The local exchange telecommunications company shall begin an investigation and make a good faith effort to resolve the issue or dispute in a manner satisfactory to both parties. In the event the issue or dispute is not resolved within 30 days, the local exchange telecommunications company shall inform the commission and 20250SB0491PN0446 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the commission shall advise the customer of the option to pursue mediation before the commission.(2) For a service installation or repair appointment for voice service within the commission's jurisdiction, the local exchange telecommunications company shall make a good faith effort to establish a mutually agreeable date and appointment window with the customer. The local exchange telecommunications company shall keep the appointment unless the customer is given advance notice that a change to the appointment is necessary.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0491PN0446 - 6 - 123456789101112